Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 3
Franchise and Elections

§ 1. Qualifications of electors.

Except as otherwise provided by this Constitution, any person may vote in an election in this state who is:

A citizen of the United States;

A resident of the State of Arkansas;

At least eighteen (18) years of age; and

Lawfully registered to vote in the election.

In addition to the qualifications under subsection (a) of this section, the General Assembly shall provide by law that a voter shall:

Present valid photographic identification before receiving a ballot to vote in person; and

Enclose a copy of valid photographic identification with his or her ballot when voting by absentee ballot.

The General Assembly shall establish by law the types of photographic identification that a person may present to comply with subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The State of Arkansas shall issue photographic identification at no charge to an eligible voter who does not have a form of photographic identification meeting the requirements of the law enacted by the General Assembly under this section.

A voter unable to present valid photographic identification when voting in person shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot.

An absentee ballot that is not accompanied by a copy of valid photographic identification shall be considered a provisional ballot.

A provisional ballot under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be counted only if the voter subsequently certifies the provisional ballot in a manner provided by law.

The General Assembly shall implement the provisions of this amendment by law.

The General Assembly may provide by law for exceptions to the requirement that a voter:

Present valid photographic identification before receiving a ballot to vote in person; and

Enclose a copy of valid photographic identification with his or her ballot when voting by absentee ballot.

A voter meeting the requirements of this section also shall comply with all additional laws regulating elections necessary for his or her vote to be counted. [As amended by Const. Amend. 8; Const. Amend. 85; Const. Amend. 99.]

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment by Amend. 8, this section read: “Every male citizen of the United States, or male person who has declared his intention of becoming a citizen of the same, of the age of twenty-one years, who has resided in the State twelve months, and in the county six months, and in the voting precinct or ward one month, next preceding any election, where he may propose to vote, shall be entitled to vote at all elections by the people.”

The former provision of this section requiring that a poll tax receipt be presented prior to registration and voting was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 51, § 17.

Ark. Const. Amend. 85, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 4 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 714,128 for and 267,326 against.

Before amendment by Amend. 85, this section read:

“§ 1. Qualifications of electors — Equal suffrage — Poll tax.

“Every citizen of the United States of the age of twenty-one years, who has resided in the State twelve months, in the county six months, and in the precinct, town or ward one month, next preceding any election at which they may propose to vote, except such persons as may for the commission of some felony be deprived of the right to vote by law passed by the General Assembly, and who shall exhibit a poll tax receipt or other evidence that they have paid their poll tax at the time of collecting taxes next preceding such election, shall be allowed to vote at any election in the State of Arkansas, provided, that persons who make satisfactory proof that they have attained the age of twenty-one years since the time of assessing taxes next preceding said election and possess the other necessary qualifications, shall be permitted to vote; and, provided, further, that the said tax receipt shall be so marked by dated stamp or written endorsement by the judges of election to whom it may be first presented as to prevent the holder thereof from voting more than once at any election. It is declared to be the purpose of this amendment to deny the right of suffrage to aliens and it is declared to be the purpose of this amendment to confer suffrage equally upon both men and women, without regard to sex; provided, that women shall not be compelled to serve on juries. [As amended by Const. Amend. 8.]”

Ark. Const. Amend. 99, which amended this section, was proposed by H.J.R. 1016 during the 2017 Regular Session and adopted at the 2018 general election by a vote of 689,454 for and 177,815 against. The amendment added subsections (b)-(f) and was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to §
7-9-119.

§ 2. Right of suffrage.

Elections shall be free and equal. No power, civil or military, shall ever interfere to prevent the free exercise of the right of suffrage; nor shall any law be enacted whereby such right shall be impaired or forfeited, except for the commission of a felony, upon lawful conviction thereof. [As amended by Const. Amend. 85.]

Publisher's Notes.

The former clause prohibiting the registration of voters was superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 39.

Ark. Const. Amend. 85, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 4 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 714,128 for and 267,326 against.

Before amendment by Amend. 85, this section read:

“§ 2. Right of suffrage.

“Elections shall be free and equal. No power, civil or military, shall ever interfere to prevent the free exercise of the right of suffrage; nor shall any law be enacted, whereby the right to vote at any election shall be made to depend upon any previous registration of the elector's name; or whereby such right shall be impaired or forfeited, except for the commission of a felony at common law, upon lawful conviction thereof.”

§ 3. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the manner of conducting elections, was repealed and replaced by Ark. Const. Amend. 50. Const. Amend. 81 later repealed section 3 of Amend. 50.

Cross References.

Elections by ballot or voting machine, Ark. Const. Amend. 50.

Protection of secrecy of votes, Ark. Const. Amend. 81.

§ 4. Privilege of electors from arrest.

Electors shall, in all cases (except treason, felony and breach of the peace,) be privileged from arrest during their attendance at elections, and going to and from the same.

§ 5. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 85, which repealed this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 4 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 714,128 for and 267,326 against.

Before repeal, this section read:

“§ 5. Idiots and insane persons.

“No idiot or insane person shall be entitled to the privileges of an elector.”

§ 6. Violation of election laws — Penalty.

Any persons who shall be convicted of fraud, bribery, or other willful and corrupt violation of any election law of this State, shall be adjudged guilty of a felony, and disqualified from holding any office of trust or profit in this State.

§ 7. Soldiers and sailors — Residence — Voting rights.

No soldier, sailor, or marine, in the military or naval service of the United States, shall acquire a residence by reason of being stationed on duty in this State.

§ 8. Time of holding elections.

The general elections shall be held biennially, on the days and at times fixed by the General Assembly. [As amended by Const. Amend. 85.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 85, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 4 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 714,128 for and 267,326 against.

Before amendment by Amend. 85, this section read: “The general elections shall be held biennially, on the first Monday of September; but the General Assembly may, by law, fix a different time.”

Cross References.

Time of general election, § 7-5-102.

§ 9. Testimony in election contest — Self-incrimination.

In trials of contested elections and in proceedings for the investigation of elections, no person shall be permitted to withhold his testimony on the ground that it may criminate himself or subject him to public infamy: but such testimony shall not be used against him in any judicial proceeding, except for perjury in giving such testimony.

§ 10. Election officers.

The General Assembly shall determine the qualifications of an election officer. [As amended by Const. Amend. 85.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 85, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 4 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 714,128 for and 267,326 against.

Before amendment, this section read:

“No person shall be qualified to serve as an election officer, who shall hold, at the time of the election, any office, appointment, or employment in or under the government of the United States, or of this State, or in any city or county or any municipal board, commission or trust in any city, save only the justices of the peace, and aldermen, notaries public and persons in the militia service of the State. Nor shall any election officer be eligible to any civil office to be filled at an election at which he shall serve — save only to such subordinate municipal or local offices, below the grade of city or county officers, as shall be designated by general law.”

§ 11. Votes to be counted.

If the officers of any election shall unlawfully refuse or fail to receive, count, or return the vote or ballot of any qualified elector, such vote or ballot shall nevertheless be counted upon the trial of any contests arising out of said election.

§ 12. Elections by representative — Viva voce vote.

All elections by persons acting in a representative capacity shall be viva voce.

Cross References.

Election of officers by General Assembly, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 14.

§ 13. Procedures for elections with one candidate.

As used in this section, “election” means:

A primary election;

A special primary election;

A general election; and

A special election.

The General Assembly may enact laws providing that if there is only one (1) person qualified as a candidate for an office after all deadlines for filing as a candidate have passed so that there will be only one (1) name listed on the election ballot for the office and no write-in candidates qualify to appear as candidates for the office on the election ballot:

The one (1) candidate for the office shall be declared elected and his or her name shall not appear on the election ballot;

The name of the candidate declared elected shall be certified as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election; and

The election shall not be held if no other office or issue is on the election ballot. [As added by Const. Amend. 95.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 95, which added this section effective January 1, 2017, was proposed by H.J.R. 1027 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 747,856 for and 317,093 against.